District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.23

Addition to Comprehensive Housing Strategy report.

The Mayor shall include in the reports to the Council pursuant to § 6-1054, analyses of the need, means, and methods of further assisting income qualified elderly tenants, disabled tenants, teachers of the District of Columbia Public Schools or a District of Columbia Public Charter School, and low-income tenants to pay their rent. The report shall consider:

(1)

The income and any other criteria that shall be used to determine which tenants qualify for the program;

(2)

The rent that qualified households shall pay;

(3)

The number and the allocation of units to be included in any set-aside;

(4)

The extent to which the program should incorporate any District affordable housing program and any federal affordable housing program available in the District;

(5)

The reporting requirements which should be imposed on housing providers subject to this subchapter and on qualified tenants to ensure that the program is effective.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 223
as added Aug. 5, 2006, D.C. Law 16-145, § 2(g), 53 DCR 4889

Cross References

Homestead housing preservation, “low-income persons” defined, see § 42-2103.
Housing Finance Agency, assisted housing projects, eligibility for rent supplements, see § 42-2703.08.